Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-813
Petition; caption.

The petition shall be captioned substantially as follows:

In the (County or District) Court of ................ County, Nebraska

Upon the petition of
)
Petition for Conciliation

)
(Under the Conciliation Court Law)

...........................
)

(Petitioner)
)

)

)

And concerning
)

)

....................... and
)

)

.............., Respondents
)

To the Conciliation Court:

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 13, p. 658;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 31.